src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! < "@U.conj.AICONJw@" > AICONJw-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.IICONJ-SG@" > IICONJ-SG-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.IICONJ-PL@" > IICONJ-PL-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.IICONJ@" > IICONJ-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.IICONJw-SG@" > IICONJw-SG-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.IICONJw-PL@" > IICONJw-PL-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.IICONJw@" > IICONJw-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.TACONJ_1@" > TACONJ_1-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.TACONJ_2@" > TACONJ_2-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.TACONJ_3@" > TACONJ_3-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.TACONJ_4@" > TACONJ_4-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.TICONJ@" >  TICONJ-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.TICONJi@" >  TICONJi-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.TICONJâ@" >  TICONJâ-MAIN ;
! < "@U.conj.TICONJ_2@" > TICONJ_2-MAIN ; ! This should be the same as TICONJ
! < "@U.conj.TICONJa@" > TICONJa-MAIN ;
 

!! !!! Intransitive animate (AI)

LEXICON AICONJ !!= @CODE@ splits in 4 moods
!< "+V":0 "+AI":0   "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+AI: AICONJ-CONT ;
 
LEXICON AICONJw !!= @CODE@ splits in 4 moods, for verbs with final -w
!< "+V":w "+AI":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@" >     # ; !Baseform
+V+AI: AICONJ-CONT ;

LEXICON AICONJn !!= @CODE@ splits in 4 moods, for verbs with final -n
!< "+V":0 "+AI":0   "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+AI: AICONJ-CONTn ;


LEXICON AICONJ-CONT
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  AI_IND ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > AI_CNJ ; !
< "+Imp":%>    "@U.mood.imp@"  >  AI_IMP ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > AI_FUT_CON ;

LEXICON AICONJ-CONTn
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  AI_INDn ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > AI_CNJn ; !
< "+Imp":%>     "@U.mood.imp@"  >  AI_IMPn ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > AI_FUT_CON ;


LEXICON AI_IND !!= @CODE@ First mode, indicative
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > AI_IND_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > AI_IND_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > AI_IND_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > AI_IND_PRS ; !

LEXICON AI_INDn !!= @CODE@ First mode, indicative
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > AI_IND_PRSn ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > AI_IND_PRSn ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > AI_IND_PRSn ; !
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > AI_IND_PRSn ; !



LEXICON AI_IND_PRS !!= @CODE@ gives person suffixes
< 0:"^EA"  "+1Sg":0 "@U.perspref.NI@"   0:n                 > # ; !
< 0:"^EA"  "+2Sg":0 "@U.perspref.KI@"   0:n                 > # ; !
<          "+3Sg":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" 0:w                 > # ; !
<          "+4Sg":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a     > # ; !
< 0:"^EA"  "+1Pl":0 "@U.perspref.NI@"   0:n 0:â 0:n         > # ; !
< 0:"^EA" "+12Pl":0 "@U.perspref.KI@"   0:n 0:a 0:w         > # ; !
< 0:"^EA" "+12Pl":0 "@U.perspref.KI@"   0:n 0:â 0:n 0:a 0:w         > # ; !
< 0:"^EA"  "+2Pl":0 "@U.perspref.KI@"   0:n 0:â 0:w 0:â 0:w > # ; !
<          "+3Pl":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" 0:w 0:a 0:k         > # ; !
<          "+4Pl":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a     > # ; !


LEXICON AI_IND_PRSn !!= @CODE@ gives person suffixes
< 0:"^EA"  "+1Sg":0 "@U.perspref.NI@"   0:i 0:n                 > # ; !
< 0:"^EA"  "+2Sg":0 "@U.perspref.KI@"   0:i 0:n                 > # ; !
<          "+3Sg":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@"                    > # ; !
<          "+4Sg":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a     > # ; !
< 0:"^EA"  "+1Pl":0 "@U.perspref.NI@"   0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n         > # ; !
< 0:"^EA" "+12Pl":0 "@U.perspref.KI@"   0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w         > # ; !
< 0:"^EA" "+12Pl":0 "@U.perspref.KI@"   0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n 0:a 0:w         > # ; !
< 0:"^EA"  "+2Pl":0 "@U.perspref.KI@"   0:i 0:n 0:â 0:w 0:â 0:w > # ; !
<          "+3Pl":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@"  0:w 0:a 0:k         > # ; !
<          "+4Pl":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a     > # ; !



!<  "+2Sg":0 "@U.verb.indFutInt2sg@"  0:n                 > # ; !
!<  "+3Sg":0 "@U.verb.indFutInt3sg@"  0:w                 > # ; !
!<  "+3oSg":0 "@U.verb.indFutInt3osg@" 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a    > # ; !
!<  "+1Pl":0 "@U.verb.indFutInt1pl@"  0:n 0:â 0:n         > # ;   ! exclusive Pl
!< "+12Pl":0 "@U.verb.indFutInt12pl@" 0:n 0:a 0:w         > # ; ! inclusive Pl
!<  "+2Pl":0 "@U.verb.indFutInt2pl@"  0:n 0:â 0:w 0:â 0:w > # ;           !
!<  "+3Pl":0 "@U.verb.indFutInt3pl@"  0:w 0:a 0:k         > # ;   !
!< "+3oPl":0 "@U.verb.indFutInt3opl@" 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a     > # ;   !

LEXICON AI_FUT_CON
  +1Sg:%>yâni  # ; 
  +2Sg:%>yani  # ; 
  +3Sg:%>ci    # ; 
  +4Sg:%>yici  # ; 
  +1Pl:%>yâhki # ; ! exclusive Pl
 +12Pl:%>yahko # ; ! inclusive Pl
  +2Pl:%>yêko  # ; 
  +3Pl:%>twâwi # ; 
  +4Pl:%>yici  # ; 


LEXICON AI_CNJ !!= @CODE@ Third mode, conjunctive
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > AI_CNJ_SUF ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > AI_CNJ_SUF ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > AI_CNJ_SUF ; !

LEXICON AI_CNJn !!= @CODE@ Third mode, conjunctive
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > AI_CNJ_SUFn ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > AI_CNJ_SUFn ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > AI_CNJ_SUFn ; !


LEXICON AI_CNJ_SUF
     +1Sg:%>yân #;
     +2Sg:%>yan	#;
     +3Sg:%>t	#;
    +4Sg:%>yit #;
     +1Pl:%>yâhk #;
    +12Pl:%>yahk #;
     +2Pl:%>yêk #;  ! NOTE: corrected according to dt, earlier we said %>nyêk
     +3Pl:%>cik #;
    +4Pl:%>yit #;


LEXICON AI_CNJ_SUFn
     +1Sg:%>iyân #;
     +2Sg:%>iyan	#;
     +3Sg:%>hk	#;
    +4Sg:%>iyit #;
     +1Pl:%>iyâhk #;
    +12Pl:%>iyahk #;
     +2Pl:%>iyêk #;  ! NOTE: corrected according to dt, earlier we said %>nyêk
     +3Pl:%>hkik #;
    +4Pl:%>iyit #;

LEXICON AI_IMP  !!= @CODE@ Fourth mode, imperative
+Imm+2Sg:0   # ; !
+Imm+12Pl:%>tân	  # ; !
+Imm+2Pl:%>k	 # ; !
+Del+2Sg:%>hkan   # ; !
+Del+12Pl:%>hkahk   # ; !
+Del+2Pl:%>hkêk   # ; !

LEXICON AI_IMPn  !!= @CODE@ Fourth mode, imperative
+Imm+2Sg:i   # ; !
+Imm+12Pl:%>îtân	  # ; !
+Imm+2Pl:%>ik	 # ; !
+Del+2Sg:%>îhkan   # ; !
+Del+12Pl:%>îhkahk   # ; !
+Del+2Pl:%>îhkêk   # ; !



LEXICON AI_IMP_LONG_E
< "+Imp":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" > imp-long-E ;!

LEXICON imp-long-E
+Imm+2Sg:ê   # ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>êk	 # ;
+Imm+12Pl:%>êtân	  # ;
+Del+2Sg:%>êhkan   # ;
+Del+2Pl:%>êhkêk   # ;
+Del+12Pl:%>êhkahk   # ;


!! !!! Intransitive inanimate (II)
!      ===========================
!      ===========================


LEXICON IICONJ  !!= @CODE@ adds the flag for no personprefixes
< "+V":0 "+II":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" > IICONJFORMS ;

LEXICON IICONJ-SG  !!= @CODE@ adds the flag for no personprefixes, only Sg forms
< "+V":0 "+II":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" > IICONJFORMS-SG ;

LEXICON IICONJ-PL  !!= @CODE@ adds the flag for no personprefixes, only Pl forms
< "+V":0 "+II":0 "@U.perspref.NULL@" > IICONJFORMS-PL ;

LEXICON IICONJFORMS !!= @CODE@ adds a baseform = Prs+3Sg
!< "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@" >  # ; !baseform
 IICONJ-CONT ; 

LEXICON IICONJFORMS-SG !!= @CODE@ adds a baseform = Prs+3Sg
!< "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@" >  # ; !baseform
 IICONJ-CONT-SG ; 

LEXICON IICONJFORMS-PL !!= @CODE@ adds a baseform = Prs+3Pl
!< "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@" >  # ; !baseform
 IICONJ-CONT-PL ; 


LEXICON IICONJw  !!= @CODE@  w final. Adds a baseform = Prs+3Sg and more diacr.flags. Be aware that two of the flags are identical, and couse overgeneration for hfst. See bz. 1859.
!< "+V":w "+II":0  "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@" "@U.perspref.NULL@" > # ; !baseform
< "+V":0 "+II":0  "@U.perspref.NULL@" > IICONJ-CONTw ;

LEXICON IICONJw-SG  !!= @CODE@  w final, only Sg forms Adds a baseform = Prs+3Sg and more diacr.flags. Be aware that two of the flags are identical, and couse overgeneration for hfst. See bz. 1859.
!< "+V":w "+II":0  "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@" "@U.perspref.NULL@" > # ; !baseform
< "+V":0 "+II":0  "@U.perspref.NULL@" > IICONJ-CONTw-SG ;
