src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBSTEMS !!= @CODE@ here come all the verbstems \\
ayêskosin AICONJn "s/he is exhausted, s/he is tired; s/he lies down from exhaustion" ;
âhkosiw:âhkosi AICONJw "s/he is sick, s/he is ill; s/he is in labour, s/he has labour pains" ;
âstwâhtowak:âstwâhto AICONJ "they bet, they bet one another, they place things for one another" ;
cîstâwêsin AICONJn "s/he makes an echo" ;
ispâhkêpayihow:ispâhkêpayiho AICONJw "s/he darts aloft" ;
kakwâhyakêyatiwak:kakwâhyakêyati AICONJ "they are in vast numbers" ;
kaskitokanêsin AICONJn "s/he has a broken hip (from falling)" ;
kistâpawacikêw:kistâpawacikê AICONJw "s/he does washing, s/he washes, s/he wipes" ;
kitimâkihitowak:kitimâkihito AICONJ "they make one another miserable; they are mean to one another" ;
kotikosin AICONJn "s/he sprains (a joint), s/he puts his/her own joint out of place; s/he falls breaking a limb" ;
mâmawi-atoskêwak:mâmawi-atoskê AICONJ "they work altogether" ;
mânahtêw:mânahtê AICONJw "s/he gets his/her pelts, s/he gets furs" ;
micimosin AICONJn "s/he sticks fast (as s/he is too big to enter)" ;
mihcêtiwak:mihcêti AICONJ "they are numerous, they are many, they are plentiful" ;
nayêhtâwîw:nayêhtâwî AICONJw "s/he is hindered, s/he has a difficult time doing something; s/he is awkward at something" ;
nâh-naspitâtowak:nâh-naspitâto AICONJ "they resemble one another; they emulate, copy one another" ;
nîhtakocin AICONJn "s/he falls down through air" ;
nîsohkwâmiwak:nîsohkwâmi AICONJ "they sleep two in a bed" ;
opîminâhkwânimiw:opîminâhkwânimi AICONJw "s/he has rope" ;
pêyâhtakowêw:pêyâhtakowê AICONJw "s/he talks slowly, carefully; s/he chooses his/her words carefully" ;
piscipohitowak:piscipohito AICONJ "they poison one another" ;
pisosin AICONJn "s/he tumbles, s/he stumbles" ;
sîwipîwiw:sîwipîwi AICONJw "s/he has edema, water retention" ;
tapahtiskwêsin AICONJn "s/he lies with lowered head" ;
wêpinitowak:wêpinito AICONJ "they abandon one another" ;
wiyascikêw:wiyascikê AICONJw "s/he sets the table" ;
yîwêyâskocin AICONJn "s/he tears his/her own clothes ragged on branches" ;
asamonwa:asamon IICONJ-PL "they are in a cluster, they are clustered together, they are in a bunch, they are bunched together" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0p always pl, cf. dialect differences in conjunct plural: (ê)-asamoki, (ê)-asamokwâw
asaskitêwa:asaskitê IICONJ-PL "they grow in a clump or mass" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0p generally plural
asastêwa:asastê IICONJ-PL "they are piled up, they are heaped up" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0p generally plural
atihkamêkoskâw:atihkamêkoskâ IICONJw-SG "there are many whitefish, whitefish are numerous" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s singular only
âkwâyâw:âkwâyâ IICONJw "it is late" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s
cimâskwan IICONJ "it is short (as a board)" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
iskwâw:iskwâ IICONJw "it is such a length, it is such a height" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s
kihci-kîsikâw:kihci-kîsikâ IICONJw "it is an important day (e.g. Christmas, New Year)" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s
kimiwaskin IICONJ "it rains frequently" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s, habitual
koskopayiw:koskopayi IICONJw "it bursts" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s
macan IICONJ "it is bad, it is evil, it is ugly" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
mihkopayin IICONJ "it reddens, it turns red" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
miyimâwahcâw:miyimâwahcâ IICONJw-SG "damp ground" ; ! VII-v singular
nahiskâtomakanwa:nahiskâtomakan IICONJ-PL "they match, they look nice together" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0p plural generally
namakîkwâw:namakîkwâ IICONJw "it disappears, it is nothing" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s
nikohtêmakan IICONJ "it prepares firewood" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
papâmihâmakan IICONJ "it flies about" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
paskêmon IICONJ-PL "it branches off, it is a fork in the road ,, [plural:] they divide, they separate" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
pêhtâkaniwiw:pêhtâkaniwi IICONJw "it is heard" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s
pîkopayin IICONJ "it is broken, it breaks down" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
sakâw:sakâ IICONJw-SG "it is bush, woods, there is a grove of trees, woodland, forest" ; ! VII-v singular
sîpâpayiw:sîpâpayi IICONJw "it goes under" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s
sôhkêkan IICONJ "it is strong (i.e. cloth)" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
watôkimihkwâw:watôkimihkwâ IICONJw "it is purple" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s, NS 152
yôtinipêstan IICONJ "it rains with wind" ; ! VII-n Independent, 0s
